Connecticut, session 2026, HB05536.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"short-term rental", "short-term rental facilitator", "short-term rental
operator" and "short-term platform" have the same meanings as
provided in section 12-408h of the general statutes.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, each
short-term rental operator that lists or advertises a short-term rental
located in the state and each owner of a short-term rental located in the
state who lists or advertises such rental solely through means other than
a short-term rental facilitator shall register each such short-term rental
property annually with the Department of Revenue Services, in a form
and manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Revenue Services. Each
such operator or owner that lists or advertises a short-term rental prior
to January 1, 2027, shall register such short-term rental property with
the department not later than January 1, 2027. On and after January 1,
2027, no such operator or owner shall list or advertise a short-term rental
prior to registering such short-term rental property with the
department.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply
to a short-term rental property that is duly licensed by a municipality
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5536
that has elected to adopt an ordinance as set forth in section 7-148qq of
the general statutes.
(3) Each short-term rental property shall be registered separately and
each registration shall include:
(A) The address of the short-term rental;
(B) (i) (I) The name and contact information of the short-term rental
operator and, if such operator is not the short-term rental owner, the
name and contact information of the short-term rental owner, or (II) the
name and contact information of the owner of a short-term rental
located in the state who lists or advertises such rental solely through
means other than a short-term rental facilitator, and (ii) if such short-
term rental operator or short-term rental owner is a business entity and
located out-of-state, the name and contact information of an agent in the
state for service of process; and
(C) A registration fee of one hundred dollars per short-term rental
property for the administrative costs of establishing, updating and
maintaining the short-term rental registry under subsection (c) of this
section.
(c) (1) The Commissioner of Revenue Services shall establish a short-
term rental registry to compile the registrations submitted under this
section. Such registry shall be posted on the Department of Revenue
Services' Internet web site and shall be searchable or organized in a
manner that allows an individual to view the registered short-term
rentals that are located within a given municipality.
(2) A short-term rental operator or a short-term rental owner
described in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section shall notify
the commissioner of any change in the registration information
provided under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section not later
than thirty days after such change takes effect.
(d) If the Commissioner of Revenue Services determines that a short-
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5536
term rental operator or a short-term rental owner described in
subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section is listing or advertising a
short-term rental for a property that is not registered under subsection
(b) of this section or duly licensed by a municipality that has elected to
adopt an ordinance as set forth in section 7-148qq of the general statutes,
the commissioner may impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand
dollars per violation on such operator or owner.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3